Illinois, session 104th, SB1823.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Veterans and Servicemembers Court Treatment 5Act is amended by changing Sections 25 and by adding Section 625.2 as follows: 7    (730 ILCS 167/25)8    Sec. 25. Procedure. 9    (a) A screening and clinical needs assessment and risk 10assessment of the defendant shall be performed as required by 11the court's policies and procedures prior to the defendant's 12admission into a veteran and servicemembers court. The 13assessment shall be conducted through the VA, VAC, and/or the 14IDVA to provide information on the defendant's veteran or 15servicemember status. 16    Any risk assessment shall be performed using an assessment 17tool approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 18Courts and as required by the court's policies and procedures. 19    (b) A mental health and substance use disorder screening 20and assessment of the defendant shall be performed by the VA, 21VAC, or by the IDVA, or as otherwise outlined and as required 22by the court's policies and procedures. The assessment shall 23include, but is not limited to, assessments of substance use   SB1823- 2 -LRB104 09453 RLC 19513 b1and mental and behavioral health needs. The clinical needs 2assessment shall be administered by a qualified professional 3of the VA, VAC, or IDVA, or individuals who meet the Department 4of Human Services substance use prevention and recovery rules 5for professional staff under 77 Ill. Adm. Code 2060, or an 6equivalent standard in any other state where treatment may 7take place, and used to inform any clinical treatment plans. 8Clinical treatment plans shall be developed, in accordance 9with the Problem-Solving Court Standards and be based, in 10part, upon the known availability of treatment resources 11available to the veterans and servicemembers court. An 12assessment need not be ordered if the court finds a valid 13screening or assessment related to the present charge pending 14against the defendant has been completed within the previous 1560 days. 16    (c) The judge shall inform the defendant that if the 17defendant fails to meet the conditions of the veterans and 18servicemembers court program, eligibility to participate in 19the program may be revoked and the defendant may be sentenced 20or the prosecution continued as provided in the Unified Code 21of Corrections for the crime charged. 22    (d) The defendant shall execute a written agreement with 23the court as to the defendant's participation in the program 24and shall agree to all of the terms and conditions of the 25program, including but not limited to the possibility of 26sanctions or incarceration for failing to abide or comply with   SB1823- 3 -LRB104 09453 RLC 19513 b1the terms of the program. 2    (e) In addition to any conditions authorized under the 3Pretrial Services Act and Section 5-6-3 of the Unified Code of 4Corrections, the court may order the participant to complete 5mental health counseling or substance use disorder treatment 6in an outpatient or residential treatment program and may 7order the participant to comply with physicians' 8recommendations regarding medications and all follow-up 9treatment for any mental health diagnosis made by the 10provider. Substance use disorder treatment programs must be 11licensed by the Department of Human Services in accordance 12with the Department of Human Services substance use prevention 13and recovery rules, or an equivalent standard in any other 14state where the treatment may take place, and use 15evidence-based treatment. When referring participants to 16mental health treatment programs, the court shall prioritize 17providers certified as community mental health or behavioral 18health centers if possible. The court shall consider the least 19restrictive treatment option when ordering mental health or 20substance use disorder treatment for participants and the 21results of clinical and risk assessments in accordance with 22the Problem-Solving Court Standards.23    (e-5) The veterans and servicemembers court shall include 24a regimen of graduated requirements, including individual and 25group therapy, substance analysis testing, close monitoring by 26the court, supervision of progress, restitution, educational   SB1823- 4 -LRB104 09453 RLC 19513 b1or vocational counseling as appropriate, and other 2requirements necessary to fulfill the veterans and 3servicemembers court program. Program phases, therapeutic 4adjustments, incentives, and sanctions, including the use of 5jail sanctions, shall be administered in accordance with 6evidence-based practices and the Problem-Solving Court 7Standards. If the participant needs treatment for an opioid 8use disorder or dependence, the court may not prohibit the 9participant from receiving medication-assisted treatment under 10the care of a physician licensed in this State to practice 11medicine in all of its branches. Veterans and servicemembers 12court participants may not be required to refrain from using 13medication-assisted treatment as a term or condition of 14successful completion of the veteran and servicemembers court 15program.16    (e-10) Recognizing that individuals struggling with mental 17health, substance use, and related co-occurring disorders have 18often experienced trauma, veterans and servicemembers court 19programs may include specialized service programs specifically 20designed to address trauma. These specialized services may be 21offered to individuals admitted to the veterans and 22servicemembers court program. Judicial circuits establishing 23these specialized programs shall partner with advocates, 24survivors, and service providers in the development of the 25programs. Trauma-informed services and programming shall be 26operated in accordance with evidence-based best practices as   SB1823- 5 -LRB104 09453 RLC 19513 b1outlined by the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Service 2Administration's National Center for Trauma-Informed Care 3(SAMHSA). 4    (f) The Court may establish a mentorship program that 5provides access and support to program participants by peer 6recovery coaches. Courts shall be responsible to administer 7the mentorship program with the support of volunteer veterans 8and local veteran service organizations, including a VAC. Peer 9recovery coaches shall be trained and certified by the Court 10prior to being assigned to participants in the program. 11    (g) Veterans with a service-connected disability and 12post-traumatic syndrome disorder.13        (1) If a veteran with a service-connected disability 14    is arrested for or charged with a criminal offense and 15    there is prima facie evidence that the veteran was 16    suffering from an episode of post-traumatic stress 17    disorder or a related mental health condition during the 18    commission of the offense, there is a rebuttable 19    presumption that the veteran is eligible to participate in 20    a veterans and servicemembers court program, and after the 21    arrest or charge, the following procedures shall take 22    place:23            (i) the veteran shall be evaluated and treated as 24        soon as practicable by a qualified medical 25        professional for post-traumatic stress disorder and 26        any other mental health condition or disorder; and  SB1823- 6 -LRB104 09453 RLC 19513 b1            (ii) the court shall order all the screenings and 2        assessments described in subsections (a) and (b).3        (2) If a veteran with a service-connected disability 4    is charged for the first time with a criminal offense, 5    including a felony, except for those offenses listed in 6    subsection (b) of Section 20 that would make him or her 7    ineligible to participate in a veterans and servicemembers 8    court program, and suffered from post-traumatic stress 9    disorder or a related mental health condition during the 10    commission of the offense, then, upon successful 11    completion of the terms and conditions of a court program, 12    the court shall dismiss the original charges against the 13    veteran or successfully terminate the veteran's sentence 14    or otherwise discharge the veteran from any further 15    proceedings against the participant in the original 16    prosecution. 17(Source: P.A. 102-1041, eff. 6-2-22.) 18    (730 ILCS 167/25.2 new)19    Sec. 25.2. Combat veteran who is disabled and has episode 20of post-traumatic syndrome disorder and needs assistance. 21    (a) When a combat veteran who is a disabled veteran has an 22episode of post-traumatic syndrome disorder and needs 23assistance, the following shall occur:24        (1) the veteran shall be taken to a VA hospital to get 25    evaluated;  SB1823- 7 -LRB104 09453 RLC 19513 b1        (2) VA treatment shall be allowed in all cases 2    involving the disabled veteran who had an episode of 3    post-traumatic stress syndrome disorder;4        (3) the veteran shall be allowed to participate in the 5    Cook County Veterans Treatment Court regardless of 6    criminal charges; and7        (4) no felony charges shall be filed against first 8    time veteran offenders.9    (b) This Section applies only to combat veterans who have 10been diagnosed as disabled veterans.